apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="афелі/й__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ю</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єві</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ю</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ю</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ю</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>єм</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їв</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ям</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ях</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ями</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ї</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__був">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>в<b/>би</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла<b/>б</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло<b/>б</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли<b/>б</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>в</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__пиши">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мо</l>
          <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ть</l>
          <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__писатиму">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>емо</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уть</l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="пи/сати__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сатим</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__писатиму"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>са</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__був"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ши</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__пиши"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сано</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сати</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>савши</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сан</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>шуч</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>шучи</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ш</l>
          <r>сати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__писатиму"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ї/сти__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стим</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__писатиму"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__був"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ж</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__пиши"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сти</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вши</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мо</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>си</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сте</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сть</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дять</l>
          <r>сти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="писати"><i>пи</i><par n="пи/сати__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="їсти"><i>ї</i><par n="ї/сти__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="афелій"><i>афелі</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кайнозой"><i>кайнозо</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
    <e lm="трофей"><i>трофе</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
    <e lm="коровай"><i>корова</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
